Idaho, session 2026, H0571.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-6409, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-6409. DISTURBING THE PEACE. (1) Every person who maliciously and
willfully disturbs the peace or quiet of any neighborhood, family or per-
son, by loud or unusual noise, or by tumultuous or offensive conduct, or by
threatening, traducing, quarreling, challenging to fight or fighting, or
fires any gun or pistol, or uses any vulgar, profane or indecent language
within the presence or hearing of children, in a loud and boisterous manner,
is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(2) Every person who maliciously and willfully disturbs the dignity or
reverential nature of any funeral, memorial service, funeral procession,
burial ceremony or viewing of a deceased person is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(3) Every person who maliciously and willfully disturbs, disquiets, or
delays any assemblage of people gathered for religious worship, meetings, or
events, whether at a place of worship or an off-site location used for reli-
gious worship, meetings, or events, by profane discourse, rude or indecent
behavior, any unnecessary noise, or any action that obstructs or interferes
with the timely commencement or continuation of the gathering, either within
the place where the worship, meeting, or event is held or so near it as to dis-
turb the order and solemnity of the gathering, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.